test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_VINIT_iitaawis_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: iitaawisenhimishinaan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: iitaawisenhimishini
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: iitaawisenhimishiwaa
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: iitaawisensimishinaan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: iitaawisensimishini
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: iitaawisensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: iitaawisenhimishiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: iitaawisenhimish***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: iitaawisensimishiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: iitaawisensimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: iitaawisenhimishing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: iitaawisenhimishan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: iitaawisenhimishag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: iitaawisensimishing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: iitaawisensimishan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: iitaawisensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisenhiminaaniban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisenhiminiiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisenhimini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisenhimiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisensiminaaniban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisensiminaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisensiminiiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisensimini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisensimiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisenhiminaaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisenhiminaanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisenhiminaanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisenhiminiing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisenhiminian
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisenhiminiag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisenhimiwaaing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisenhimiwaaan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisenhimiwaaag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisensiminaaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisensiminaanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisensiminaanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisensiminiing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisensiminian
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisensiminiag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisensimiwaaing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisensimiwaaan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisensimiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhimibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhimibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhimibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhim***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhim***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhim***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensimibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensimibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensimibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensim***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensim***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensim***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisenhishinaaniban
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisenhishiniiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisenhishini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisenhishiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisensishinaaniban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisensishinaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisensishiniiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisensishini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisensishiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisenhishinaaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisenhishinaanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisenhishinaanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisenhishiniing
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisenhishinian
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisenhishiniag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisenhishiwaaing
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisenhishiwaaan
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisenhishiwaaag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisensishinaaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisensishinaanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisensishinaanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisensishiniing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisensishinian
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisensishiniag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisensishiwaaing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisensishiwaaan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisensishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhishibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhishibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhishibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhish***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhish***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhish***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensishibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensishibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensishibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensish***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensish***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhinaanibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhinaanibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhinaanibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhiniibaning
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhiniibanan
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhiniibanag
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhini***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhini***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhini***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhiwaaibaning
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhiwaaibanan
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhiwaaibanag
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensinaanibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensinaanibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensinaanibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensinaan***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensiniibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensiniibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensiniibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensini***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensini***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensini***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensiwaaibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensiwaaibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensiwaaibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisimishinaaniban
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisimishinaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisimishiniiban
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisimishini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisimishiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisimishinaaning
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisimishinaanan
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisimishinaanag
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisimishiniing
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisimishinian
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisimishiniag
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisimishiwaaing
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisimishiwaaan
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: iitaawisimishibaning
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: iitaawisimishibanan
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: iitaawisimishibanag
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisimish***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisimish***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisiminaanibaning
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisiminaanibanan
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisiminaanibanag
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisiminaan***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iitaawisiminiibaning
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iitaawisiminiibanan
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iitaawisiminiibanag
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisimini***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisimini***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisimini***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisimiwaaibaning
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisimiwaaibanan
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisimiwaaibanag
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisishinaanibaning
     iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisishinaanibanan
     iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisishinaanibanag
     iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ing
